Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3017
Application for charter; hearing; how conducted.

The hearing required by section 8-3016 shall be conducted under the Administrative Procedure Act and shall comply with the requirements of the act.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 17;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 31.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.